Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6730
Failure to meet standards; violations; department; powers.

(1) The department may deny registration or refuse renewal of or remove a registration from the Medication Aide Registry for failure to meet the standards in section 71-6725 or for violation of the Medication Aide Act or the rules and regulations.

(2) If the department proposes to deny, refuse renewal of, or remove a registration, it shall send the applicant or registrant a notice setting forth the action to be taken and the reasons for the determination. The denial, refusal to renew, or removal shall become final thirty days after mailing the notice unless the applicant or registrant gives written notice to the department of his or her desire for an informal conference or for a formal hearing.

(3) Notice may be served by any method specified in section 25-505.01, or the department may permit substitute or constructive service as provided in section 25-517.02 when service cannot be made with reasonable diligence by any of the methods specified in section 25-505.01.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 20.